Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201771-1108.01
Intellectual disability, defined.

Intellectual disability means significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning which is associated with significant impairments in adaptive functioning manifested before the age of twenty-two years. Significant subaverage general intellectual functioning shall refer to a score of seventy or below on a properly administered and valid intelligence quotient test.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-1110;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 32;

Laws 2016, LB1039, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB333, § 2.
May 24, 2017